District of Columbia statutes.
22-3231

Trafficking in stolen property.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “traffics” means:

(1)

To sell, pledge, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of property to another person as consideration for anything of value; or

(2)

To buy, receive, possess, or obtain control of property with intent to do any of the acts set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(b)

A person commits the offense of trafficking in stolen property if, on 2 or more separate occasions, that person traffics in stolen property, knowing or having reason to believe that the property has been stolen.

(c)

It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section, alone or in conjunction with § 22-1803, that the property was not in fact stolen, if the accused engages in conduct which would constitute the crime if the attendant circumstances were as the accused believed them to be.

(d)

Any person convicted of trafficking in stolen property shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 131, 29 DCR 3976
Apr. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-120, § 101(b), 58 DCR 11235
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(o), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3202, § 23-546, and § 50-1403.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3831.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-120, in subsec. (c), substituted “section, alone or in conjunction with § 22-1803,” for “section”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $10,000” in (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(b) of Receiving Stolen Property and Public Safety Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-261, December 21, 2011, 58 DCR 11232).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(b) of Receiving Stolen Property and Public Safety Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-326, March 19, 2012, 59 DCR 2384).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(o) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.